New Jersey, session 222, S4258.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  R.S.53:1-2 is amended to read as follows: 53:1-2. a. The Superintendent of State Police, hereinafter referred to as the superintendent, shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall serve during the term of office of the Governor appointing [him] the superintendent and until the superintendent's successor is appointed and has qualified and shall be removable by the Governor after charges have been preferred and a hearing granted. b. The superintendent shall hold the uniformed rank of Colonel of the State Police and be entitled to wear the corresponding uniform.  The superintendent shall be granted all privileges and shall have all powers conferred upon members of the State Police pursuant to current law, including those set forth in R.S.53:2-1. c. In order to hold the rank of colonel, the superintendent shall 1[complete, update, or renew any] be a graduate of the1 New Jersey State Police Academy 1[basic police officer certification required to hold the position of New Jersey State Police Officer]1 and shall apply for and obtain an initial or renewal law enforcement license pursuant to P.L.2022, c.65 (C.52:17B-71a et al.) 1if the superintendent does not already hold an active license1. d. The superintendent shall receive [such] a salary [as shall be provided by law] 1[in the amount of $210,000 pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1974, c.55 (C.52:14-15.107)] as shall be provided by law1, and shall, before entering upon the duties of [his] the office, give a bond to the State of New Jersey in the sum of [$20,000.00] $20,000 for the faithful performance of [his] the superintendents duties. 1[e. The superintendent shall serve as and perform the duties of the State Director of Emergency Management.]1 (cf: P.L.1971, c.105, s.2) 2.    (New section) Notwithstanding the provisions of the State Police Retirement System Act, P.L.1965, c.89 (C.53:5A-1 et seq.), or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a person who is a retirant of the State Police Retirement System shall be eligible for appointment by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, as the Superintendent of State Police 1[, and a retirant so appointed shall not be required to reenroll in the State Police Retirement System, provided that the retirement meets the requirement for a bona fide severance from employment and any employment or reemployment under this section shall not be prearranged before retirement, and provided further that the salary established by law for the Superintendent of State Police for a person who is a retirant of the system and who is not reenrolled in the system shall not be considered as compensation for retirement system purposes and shall not enhance the retirement allowance received by that person as a retirant of the system. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a person appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, as the Superintendent of State Police] without reenrollment in the retirement system and1 shall 1be eligible to1 hold the rank of Colonel of the New Jersey State Police regardless of age or retirant status under the State Police Retirement System Act, P.L.1965, c.89 (C.53:5A-1 et seq.), provided that the person completed the requirements established pursuant to subsection c. of R.S.53:1-2 and previously retired in good standing prior to appointment. This section shall be effective if the qualified status of the retirement system under federal law can be maintained upon its application, and any modifications to the system as may be available shall be made to allow for its application. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.